Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,113
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Outpatient Surgical Procedures Data Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Medicaid means the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act;

(3) Medicare means Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, as such title existed on January 1, 2003;

(4) Outpatient surgical procedure means a surgical procedure provided to patients who do not require inpatient hospitalization;

(5) Primary payor means the public payor or private payor which is expected to be responsible for the largest percentage of the patient's current bill;

(6) Private payor means any nongovernmental source of funding; and

(7) Public payor means medicaid, medicare, and any other governmental source of funding.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 88;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 752.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.